Illinois, session 104th, SB1672.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The School Code is amended by adding Section 510-20.53a as follows: 6    (105 ILCS 5/10-20.53a new)7    Sec. 10-20.53a. Early literacy screener reporting.8    (a) On or before the 30th day of the 2026-2027 school year, 9each school district that serves students in any of grades 10kindergarten through 3 shall report, on the assessment 11reporting form developed by the State Board of Education 12pursuant to Section 22-82 of this Code, the following 13information:14        (1) any early literacy screeners used by the district 15    in grades kindergarten through 3, including which skill 16    areas the screener is intended to identify;17        (2) the grade level of students who are administered 18    the early literacy screeners under paragraph (1); and19        (3) the frequency with which the early literacy 20    screeners under paragraph (1) are administered to 21    students, by grade, each year.22    (b) On or before January 1, 2027, the State Board of 23Education shall file a report with the General Assembly   SB1672 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 08071 LNS 18117 b1outlining the data received under subsection (a). This report 2shall be posted publicly on the State Board of Education's 3Internet website no later than March 1, 2027.4    (c) This Section is repealed on July 1, 2027.